Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-453
Permit to hunt deer, antelope, or elk; individual or joint application; ineligibility of individual, when.

Applications for the special permits provided for in section 37-447 or 37-449 shall be made individually or on a unit basis. If such application is made on a unit basis, not more than six applicants may apply for such permit in one application. If such application is granted, such special permits shall be issued to the persons so applying. If any one of the persons so applying shall be ineligible to receive such special permit, the entire group so applying shall be disqualified. No person applying for such special permit on a unit basis shall also apply individually.

Laws 1953, c. 126, § 1, p. 392;

Laws 1959, c. 156, § 2, p. 585;

Laws 1985, LB 557, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-215.02;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 163;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 22;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 15;

Laws 2023, LB565, § 28.